n11.dix
<pardef n="coVMb/u_n">
        <e><p>
                <l>u</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ugalYu</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>annu</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ugalYannu</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>iniMxa</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ugalYiMxa</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>igeV</l>
				<r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>igAgi</l>
				<r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>igoskara</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>ugalYigeV</l>
				<r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>ugalYigAgi</l>
				<r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>ugalYigoskara</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ina deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>ugalYa deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>iniMxa</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ugalYiMxa</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ina</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>ugalYa</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>inalli</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>ugalYalli</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>e</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ugalYe</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sAXu/_n">
        <e><p>
                <l>vu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>vannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>viniMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>vigeV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>vigAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>vigoskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYigeV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>galYigAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>galYigoskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vina deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYa deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>viniMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vina</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vinalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>ve</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYe</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="IMtu"><i>IMt</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="eVlYalu"><i>eVlYal</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="oVnalu"><i>oVnal</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="kanalu"><i>kanal</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="kisuru"><i>kisur</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="kuluku"><i>kuluk</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="cAlYisu"><i>cAlYis</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="wAlYxu"><i>wAlYx</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="wuduku"><i>wuduk</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="weVMgu"><i>weVMg</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="xeVMgu"><i>xeVMg</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="nilku"><i>nilk</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="piMcu"><i>piMc</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="bixircu"><i>bixirc</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="mAwuwaru"><i>mAwuwar</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="misugu"><i>misug</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="muwwu"><i>muww</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="mejukattu"><i>mejukatt</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="sivuru"><i>sivur</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="haMxu"><i>haMx</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="hUNu"><i>hUN</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="hoVrasu"><i>hoVras</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="akkalu"><i>akkal</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="amAnawwu"><i>amAnaww</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="SAlu"><i>SAl</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="aMdu"><i>aMd</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="alYalu"><i>alYal</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="Apawwu"><i>Apaww</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="iMbu"><i>iMb</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="iswihAru"><i>iswihAr</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="udu"><i>ud</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="urulYu"><i>urulY</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="eVdaru"><i>eVdar</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="bikkattu"><i>bikkatt</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="biccu"><i>bicc</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="birugaNNu"><i>birugaNN</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="bisupu"><i>bisup</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="burugu"><i>burug</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="beVlYagu"><i>beVlYag</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="eVluvu"><i>eVluv</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="eruperu"><i>eruper</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="oVgatu"><i>oVgat</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="oVwwu"><i>oVww</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="oVsadu"><i>oVsad</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="kaMgu"><i>kaMg</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="kaggawwalu"><i>kaggawwal</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="kadixu"><i>kadix</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="kawwalu"><i>kawwal</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="kamatu"><i>kamat</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="karixu"><i>karix</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="kallu"><i>kall</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="kasabu"><i>kasab</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="kAdu"><i>kAd</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="kiMkApu"><i>kiMkAp</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="kisuru"><i>kisur</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="kuggu"><i>kugg</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="kuruhu"><i>kuruh</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="kUdalu"><i>kUdal</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="keVmmu"><i>keVmm</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="kEPiyawwu"><i>kEPiyaww</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="koVnaru"><i>koVnar</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="koVsagu"><i>koVsag</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="komu"><i>kom</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="Karcu"><i>Karc</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="gadu"><i>gad</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="galagu"><i>galag</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="gAMpu"><i>gAMp</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="gilAvu"><i>gilAv</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="guMdu"><i>guMd</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="guNpu"><i>guNp</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="gUnu"><i>gUn</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="gErawwu"><i>gEraww</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="goVNagu"><i>goVNag</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="gotu"><i>got</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="gOju"><i>gOj</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="cappodu"><i>cappod</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="cAtu"><i>cAt</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="cituku"><i>cituk</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="cItu"><i>cIt</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="curutu"><i>curut</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="celYu"><i>celY</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="jaddu"><i>jadd</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="jarAyu"><i>jarAy</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="jANu"><i>jAN</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="jAhIru"><i>jAhIr</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="jInu"><i>jIn</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="jUbu"><i>jUb</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="jotikolu"><i>jotikol</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="tagaru"><i>tagar</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="Takku"><i>Takk</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="dAgu"><i>dAg</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="doVlYlYu"><i>doVlYlY</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="wakkisu"><i>wakkis</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="waNivu"><i>waNiv</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="wappalu"><i>wappal</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="waradu"><i>warad</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="waswIku"><i>waswIk</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="wAku"><i>wAk</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="wAllUku"><i>wAllUk</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="wixxupAtu"><i>wixxupAt</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="wilYivu"><i>wilYiv</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="wuppulYu"><i>wuppulY</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="wurwu"><i>wurw</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="weVgalYu"><i>weVgalY</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="weVlYuvu"><i>weVlYuv</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="woVMdilu"><i>woVMdil</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="woVxalu"><i>woVxal</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="wolu"><i>wol</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="xaMgu"><i>xaMg</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="xammasu"><i>xammas</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="xasyu"><i>xasy</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="xAswAnu"><i>xAswAn</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="xuMxu"><i>xuMx</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="xevaxAru"><i>xevaxAr</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="nagu"><i>nag</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="navuru"><i>navur</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="nuccu"><i>nucc</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="neVllullu"><i>neVllull</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="padeVvu"><i>padeVv</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="pAsu"><i>pAs</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="peVtluppu"><i>peVtlupp</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="PEsalu"><i>PEsal</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="bajAru"><i>bajAr</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="baygu"><i>bayg</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="bAnu"><i>bAn</i><par n="coVMb/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="sAXu"><i>sAXu</i><par n="sAXu/_n"/></e>
